Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 27. Virginia State University.

§ 23.1-2700.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of Virginia State University (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “The Visitors of Virginia State University” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as Virginia State University (the University).

All laws relating to Virginia State College or the board of visitors of Virginia State College shall be construed as relating to the University or the board, respectively.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 948, 969, §§ 23-165.1, 23-165.2, 23-166, 23-174; 1930, pp. 768, 769; 1946, p. 74; 1964, c. 70; 1979, c. 147; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2701.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 15 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least three shall be alumni of the University and at least 10 shall be residents of the Commonwealth.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees.

History.

1964, c. 70, § 23-165.4; 1979, c. 147; 1993, c. 697; 1999, c. 752; 2008, cc. 465, 477; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2702.
Powers and duties.

The board shall appoint all professors, teachers, and agents and fix their salaries and generally direct the affairs of the University.

The board may confer degrees.

History.

1964, c. 70, §§ 23-165.6, 23-165.8; 1979, c. 147; 2016, c. 588; 2017, c. 314.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2017, c. 229, cl. 1 provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly that in order to support a strong Commonwealth and to fulfill the principles of the federal Morrill Land-Grant Acts of 1862 and 1890 and Smith-Lever Act of 1914 ( 7 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), the Commonwealth’s two land-grant universities, Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University and Virginia State University, shall maintain strong programs of instruction, research, and the extension of knowledge in agriculture, natural resources, family and consumer sciences, community viability, youth development, and such other fields as are necessary to fulfill their respective land-grant missions. Therefore, it is incumbent on these two institutions to ensure that these objectives will be addressed in all strategic plans for the future.”

Acts
2017, c. 314, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective retroactively to October 1, 2016.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 314, effective retroactively to October 1, 2016, in subsection A, substituted “and fix” for “fix” and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 23.1-2703.
Courses of study.

The curriculum of the University shall include agriculture, business, education, engineering, the liberal arts and sciences, and military science.

History.

1964, c. 70, § 23-165.9; 1979, c. 147; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2704.
Cooperative Extension Service.

For the purposes of this section:“Cooperative extension service” means the function traditionally associated with the term “extension” that traditionally focuses on agriculture, including horticulture and silviculture, agribusiness, home economics, community resource development, and 4-H Clubs.“Extension” means the joint federal, state, and local program designed to aid the transfer of information and research capabilities of land-grant universities to citizens.

As provided in Article 2 (§

23.1-2608

et seq.) of Chapter 26 and subject to the federally required plan, the Cooperative Extension Service Program within the University, (the Program) is recognized. The University may accept grants, gifts, or donations for the Program from the local governing bodies of the Commonwealth, other public or private agencies, and individual donors. The Service shall be operated cooperatively by Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University and the University, with agreed-upon areas of program and service emphasis as set forth in the unified plan submitted by the two institutions to the U.S. Department of Agriculture. The University shall file such reports on the activities of the Program as may be required by law or requested by the Governor, and the two institutions shall file such reports on the unified plan as may be required by law or requested by the Governor.

History.

1994, c. 433, § 23-165.11; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2705.
Gifts, grants, devises, and bequests; governmental aid.

The board may take, hold, receive, and enjoy any gift, grant, devise, or bequest to the board or to or for the benefit of the University. Any such gift, grant, devise, or bequest shall be used for the purposes designated by the donor, or if no purposes are so designated, for the general purposes of the board.

The University shall receive the governmental aid designated in §§

23.1-2638

and

23.1-2639

.

History.

Code 1919, § 957, § 23-170; 1930, p. 769; 1964, c. 70; 1979, c. 147; 2016, c. 588.